Massachusetts, session 194th, SD2647.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Massachusetts General Laws Chapter 18C Section 12 is hereby amended by inserting at
the end the following:--
"(f) If the child advocate, or the office of the child advocate, elects to withhold a report or
components of a report, it shall provide any requesting party with the reasons therefore in
writing, which shall also be recorded and available for public inspection, provided further, that
nothing in this section shall require any action by office of the child advocate which would have
the purpose or effect of compromising any investigation or protective measures that could be, or
are being, undertaken by the office of the child advocate or the department of children and
families."
of 1